Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Article 1. Oaths, Certifications, Notarizations, and Verifications.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 60, SLA 2005 (HB 97), relating to the 2005 amendments of various sections in this article affecting relating to the taking of oaths, affirmations, and acknowledgements and to notaries’ responsibilities when notarizing, verifying, and acknowledging signed instruments, see 2005 House Journal 131.

Sec. 09.63.010.
Oath, affirmation, and acknowledgment.

The following persons may take an oath, affirmation, or acknowledgment in the state:

a justice, judge, or magistrate of a court of the State of Alaska or of the United States;

a clerk or deputy clerk of a court of the State of Alaska or of the United States;

a notary public;

a United States postmaster;

a commissioned officer under AS

09.63.050

(4);

a municipal clerk carrying out the clerk’s duties under AS

29.20.380

;

the lieutenant governor when carrying out the lieutenant governor’s duties under AS

24.05.160

;

the presiding officer of each legislative house when carrying out the officer’s duties under AS

24.05.170

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 37 SLA 1981; am § 1 ch 35 SLA 1989; am § 1 ch 60 SLA 2005)

Sec. 09.63.020.
Certification of documents.

A matter required or authorized to be supported, evidenced, established, or proven by the sworn statement, declaration, verification, certificate, oath, or affidavit, in writing of the person making it (other than a deposition, an acknowledgment, an oath of office, or an oath required to be taken before a specified official other than a notary public) may be supported, evidenced, established, or proven by the person certifying in writing “under penalty of perjury” that the matter is true. The certification shall state the date and place of execution, the fact that a notary public or other official empowered to administer oaths is unavailable, and the following:

A person who makes a false sworn certification which the person does not believe to be true under penalty of perjury is guilty of perjury.

“I certify under penalty of perjury that the foregoing is true.”

History.

(§ 1 ch 37 SLA 1981)

Cross references. —

For crime of perjury, see AS

11.56.200

.

Sec. 09.63.030.
Notarization.

When a document is required by law to be notarized, the person who executes the document shall sign and swear to or affirm it before an officer authorized by law to take the person’s oath or affirmation and the officer shall certify on the document that it was signed and sworn to or affirmed before the officer.

The certificate required by this section may be in substantially the following form:

If the document is sworn to or affirmed before a notary public of the state, the notary public shall

affix on the document the

notary public’s official signature and official seal; and

date of expiration of the notary public’s commission; and

comply with AS

44.50.060

—

44.50.065

and other applicable law.

Subscribed and sworn to or affirmed before me at on (date). Signature of Officer Title of Officer

Click to view

History.

(§ 1 ch 37 SLA 1981; am § 2 ch 60 SLA 2005)

Sec. 09.63.040.
Verification.

When a document is required by law to be verified, the person required to verify it shall certify under oath or affirmation that the person has read the document and believes its content to be true.

The person who makes the verification shall sign it before a person authorized by law to take the person’s oath or affirmation.

A verification made under this section may be in substantially the following form:

If the verification is sworn to or affirmed before a notary public of the state, the notary public shall

affix on the document the

notary public’s official signature and official seal; and

date of expiration of the notary public’s commission; and

comply with AS

44.50.060

—

44.50.065

and other applicable law.

I say on oath or affirm that I have read the foregoing (or attached) document and believe all statements made in the document are true. Signature Subscribed and sworn to or affirmed before me at on (date). Signature of Officer Title of Officer

Click to view

History.

(§ 1 ch 37 SLA 1981; am § 17 ch 85 SLA 1988; am § 3 ch 60 SLA 2005)